Wisconsin, session 2025, AB944.
do enact as follows:AB944,11Section 1. 5.05 (11r) of the statutes is created to read:AB944,2,725.05 (11r) Aids to municipalities for the purchase of election supplies 3and equipment. (a) From the appropriation under s. 20.510 (1) (ff), the 4commission may award grants to municipalities for the purchase of election 5supplies and equipment, including electronic poll books and accessibility supplies 6and equipment. In each biennium, the commission may award grants under this 7subsection in the following amounts:AB944,2,981. No more than $2,500,000 to municipalities with a population exceeding 9250,000.AB944,2,11102. No more than $1,000,000 to municipalities with a population exceeding 11100,000, but not exceeding 250,000.AB944,2,13123. No more than $500,000 to municipalities with a population exceeding 1350,000, but not exceeding 100,000.AB944,2,15144. No more than $250,000 to municipalities with a population not exceeding 1550,000.AB944,3,416(b) Except as provided in par. (c), a municipality may apply to the commission 17for a grant under this subsection in the manner determined by the commission, but 18an application must be received no later than 180 days before any general election 19conducted in the municipality. No municipality may receive a grant under this 20subsection unless the municipality enters into an agreement with the commission 21to have the commission conduct at least one random inspection of the supplies and 22equipment that the municipality purchases with the grant moneys. Any grant 1awarded to a municipality under this subsection shall be no less than $250. The 2commission shall complete an audit of the grant program no later than 90 days 3after each general election and submit an audit report to the legislature under s. 413.172 (2).AB944,3,85(c) A county may apply for a grant under this subsection on behalf of a 6municipality located in the county and the county may administer the grant for the 7purchase of supplies and equipment described under par. (a), under the conditions 8described in par. (b), if so authorized by the municipality.AB944,29Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 10insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB944,316Section 3. 20.510 (1) (ff) of the statutes is created to read:AB944,3,191720.510 (1) (ff) Local aids for the purchase of election supplies and equipment. 18Biennially, the amounts in the schedule to award grants to municipalities for the 19purchase of election supplies or equipment under s. 5.05 (11r).AB944,3,2020